Maryland, session 2025, SB0701.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0701*

SENATE BILL 701
21–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b–2) “Cottage food product” means a [nonhazardous] NONPOTENTIALLY
HAZARDOUS food, as specified in regulations adopted by the Department, OR A
REFRIGERATED BAKED GOOD, that is sold in the State in accordance with § 21–330.1 of
this subtitle and regulations adopted by the Department:
(1) Directly to a consumer from a residence, at a farmer’s market, at a
public event, by personal delivery, or by mail delivery; or
(2) To a retail food store, including a grocery store, or a food cooperative.
(J–2) (1) “REFRIGERATED BAKED GOOD” MEANS A BAKED FOOD PRODUCT
THAT REQUIRES REFRIGERATION TO MAINTAIN ITS SAFETY, QUALITY, OR
FRESHNESS.
(2) “REFRIGERATED BAKED GOOD” INCLUDES:
(I) A CHEESECAKE;
(II) A CUSTARD AND MERINGUE;
(III) A FRESH FRUIT TART; AND
(IV) A REFRIGERATED NONMEAT PIE.
[(j–2)] (J–3) (1) “Semipermanent food service facility” means a food service
facility that:
(i) Is built at a location other than where it operates;
(ii) Is transported as a complete unit that does not require a building
permit to install on the location at which it operates;
(iii) Has no indoor seating for patrons; and
(iv) When serving cooked food, serves only foods cooked for
immediate service.
(2) “Semipermanent food service facility” does not include a food service
facility that is a mechanically, electrically, manually, or otherwise propelled vehicle
operating on land or water that moves as part of its routine operation to:

SENATE BILL 701 3
(i) Change location for sales;
(ii) Obtain food and other supplies;
(iii) Fill potable water supply holding tanks;
(iv) Empty wastewater holding tanks; or
(v) Provide for the cleaning and sanitation of equipment and
utensils.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.